Missouri, session 2026, HB2527.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 135, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 135.2000, to read as follows:
135.2000. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Department", the Missouri department of revenue;
(2) "Labor costs", the total compensation paid by a taxpayer to an employee as
reported in box 5 of the employee's W-2. For the purposes of this subdivision,
"employee" shall mean an individual employed by a taxpayer as pressroom or
mailroom staff;
(3) "Qualifying newspaper printing plant", any individual, partnership, or
corporation as described under section 143.441 or 143.471 that:
(a) Is headquartered in this state; and
(b) Derives a majority of printing revenue from the printing of newspapers
intended for public distribution;
(4) "State tax liability", any liability incurred by a taxpayer pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 143 or chapter 148, exclusive of the provisions relating to the
withholding of tax as provided for in sections 143.191 to 143.265 and related provisions;
(5) "Tax credit", a credit against the tax otherwise due under chapter 143,
excluding withholding tax imposed under sections 143.191 to 143.265;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2527 2
(6) "Taxpayer", any qualifying newspaper printing plant that is subject to the
tax imposed under chapter 143, excluding withholding tax imposed under sections
143.191 to 143.265.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, a taxpayer shall be
authorized to claim a tax credit against the taxpayer's state tax liability in an amount
equal to fifty percent of the labor costs incurred by the taxpayer during the tax year.
3. (1) Any amount of tax credits authorized pursuant to this section that exceeds
a taxpayer's state tax liability shall be considered an overpayment of taxes and shall be
refunded to the taxpayer.
(2) Tax credits authorized pursuant to this section may be transferred, sold, or
assigned.
(3) The total amount of tax credits that may be authorized pursuant to this
section in any tax year shall not exceed seven million dollars.
4. A taxpayer seeking tax credits authorized pursuant to this section shall submit
an application to the department on a form to be provided by the department. Such
application form shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) The taxpayer's name and address;
(2) The total amount of labor costs incurred during the tax year; and
(3) Any other information reasonably requested by the department.
5. The department may promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this
section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
6. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The program authorized pursuant to this section shall automatically sunset
six years after the effective date of this section unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly;
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized pursuant to
this section is sunset; and
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed to impair or impede
the state's fulfillment of any obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or

HB 2527 3
redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to this section prior to the date the
program authorized pursuant to this section is sunset.
✔